District of Columbia statutes.
7-1151.01

Statement of anticipated funding.

No later than 30 days before the first day of a fiscal year, the Department of Mental Health shall issue to each certified Mental Health Rehabilitation Services provider a statement of anticipated annual funding. The statement shall include language that the anticipated funding level is subject to change based upon actual budget availability and at the discretion of the Department of Mental Health.

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 5052, 54 DCR 7052
2001 Ed., § 7-1141.01.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5052 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5014 of Fiscal Year 2009 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-468, July 28, 2008, 55 DCR 8746).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5011 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).

Short title: Section 5051 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle F of title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Mental Health Funding Allocation Act of 2007”.

Short title: Section 5013 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle G of title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Mental Health Funding Allocation Act of 2008”.

Section 5014 of D.C. Law 17-219 repeated the language of this section.

Due to the codification of D.C. Law 20-61, §§ 5112-5120 as Chapter 11B of this title, former Chapter 11B was renumbered as Chapter 11C.